Illinois, session 104th, HB2270.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 2-115 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/2-115)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 2-115)7    Sec. 2-115. Investigators. 8    (a) The Secretary of State, for the purpose of more 9effectively carrying out the provisions of the laws in 10relation to motor vehicles, shall have power to appoint such 11number of investigators as he may deem necessary. It shall be 12the duty of such investigators to investigate and enforce 13violations of the provisions of this Act administered by the 14Secretary of State and provisions of Chapters 11, 12, 13, 14, 15and 15 and to investigate and report any violation by any 16person who operates as a motor carrier of property as defined 17in Section 18-100 of this Act and does not hold a valid 18certificate or permit. Such investigators shall have and may 19exercise throughout the State all of the powers of peace 20officers.21    No person may be retained in service as an investigator 22under this Section after he or she has reached 65 60 years of 23age, except for a person employed in the title of Capitol   HB2270 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11741 LNS 21830 b1Police Investigator, in which case, that person may not be 2retained in service after that person has reached 65 years of 3age.4    The Secretary of State must authorize to each investigator 5employed under this Section and to any other employee of the 6Office of the Secretary of State exercising the powers of a 7peace officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) clearly 8states that the badge is authorized by the Office of the 9Secretary of State and (ii) contains a unique identifying 10number. No other badge shall be authorized by the Office of the 11Secretary of State.12    (b) The Secretary may expend such sums as he deems 13necessary from Contractual Services appropriations for the 14Department of Police for the purchase of evidence, for the 15employment of persons to obtain evidence, and for the payment 16for any goods or services related to obtaining evidence. Such 17sums shall be advanced to investigators authorized by the 18Secretary to expend funds, on vouchers signed by the 19Secretary. In addition, the Secretary of State is authorized 20to maintain one or more commercial checking accounts with any 21State banking corporation or corporations organized under or 22subject to the Illinois Banking Act for the deposit and 23withdrawal of moneys to be used solely for the purchase of 24evidence and for the employment of persons to obtain evidence, 25or for the payment for any goods or services related to 26obtaining evidence; provided that no check may be written on   HB2270 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11741 LNS 21830 b1nor any withdrawal made from any such account except on the 2written signatures of 2 persons designated by the Secretary to 3write such checks and make such withdrawals, and provided 4further that the balance of moneys on deposit in any such 5account shall not exceed $5,000 at any time, nor shall any one 6check written on or single withdrawal made from any such 7account exceed $5,000.8    All fines or moneys collected or received by the 9Department of Police under any State or federal forfeiture 10statute; including, but not limited to moneys forfeited under 11Section 12 of the Cannabis Control Act, moneys forfeited under 12Section 85 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 13Protection Act, and moneys distributed under Section 413 of 14the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, shall be deposited 15into the Secretary of State Evidence Fund.16    In all convictions for offenses in violation of this Act, 17the Court may order restitution to the Secretary of any or all 18sums expended for the purchase of evidence, for the employment 19of persons to obtain evidence, and for the payment for any 20goods or services related to obtaining evidence. All such 21restitution received by the Secretary shall be deposited into 22the Secretary of State Evidence Fund. Moneys deposited into 23the fund shall, subject to appropriation, be used by the 24Secretary of State for the purposes provided for under the 25provisions of this Section.26(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.)